Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4286.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1170c. By not later than the 2026-2027 school year, the department shall ensure that the model core academic curriculum content standards for health education and the subject area content expectations and guidelines for health education under section 1278a provide for all of the following: (a) An overview of human biology related to pregnancy. (b) An overview of human development inside the uterus. (c) A presentation of a high-definition ultrasound video, not less than 3 minutes in duration, showing the development of the brain, heart, sex organs, and other vital organs in early fetal development. (d) A presentation of a high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation, comparable to the Meet Baby Olivia video developed by Live Action, showing the process of fertilization and every stage of human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development for every significant marker of pregnancy until birth.